Hawaii statutes.
[§46-19.4 Priority permitting process for
renewable energy projects.] All agencies shall provide priority handling
and processing for all county permits required for renewable energy projects.

For purposes of this section,
"agencies" means any executive department, independent commission,
board, bureau, office, or other establishment of a county, or any quasi-public
institution that is supported in whole or in part by county funds. [L 2007, c
205, §2]

Cross References

Other related sections, see §§196-1.5, 201-12.5, 201N-14, and
226-18(c)(10).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next